en: School Uniforms
xx: School Uniforms
cs: Školní uniformy
da: Skoleuniformer
de: Schuluniformen
es: Uniformes de colegio
fr: Uniformes scolaires
it: Uniformi scolastiche
ja: 学生服
nl: Schooluniformen
no: Skoleuniformer
pl: Mundurki szkolne
pt: Uniformes escolares
ru: Школьная форма
sv: Skoluniformer
tr: Okul Üniformaları

en: Security Uniforms
xx: Security Uniforms
cs: Uniformy pro bezpečnostní agentury
da: Vagtuniformer
de: Sicherheitsdienst-Bekleidung
es: Uniformes de seguridad
fr: Uniformes de sécurité
it: Uniformi agenti di sicurezza
ja: 警備服
nl: Beveiligingsuniformen
no: Vekteruniformer
pl: Mundury służb bezpieczeństwa
pt: Uniformes de segurança
ru: Форма для охранников
sv: Säkerhetsuniformer
tr: Güvenlik Üniformaları

en: Sports Uniforms
xx: Sports Uniforms
cs: Sportovní dresy
da: Sportsuniformer
de: Sportuniformen
es: Uniformes deportivos
fr: Uniformes de sport
it: Divise sportive
ja: スポーツユニフォーム
nl: Sporttenues
no: Idrettsdrakter
pl: Stroje sportowe
pt: Uniformes esportivos
ru: Спортивная форма
sv: Sportdräkter
tr: Spor Formaları

en: American Football Uniforms
xx: American Football Uniforms
cs: Dresy na americký fotbal
da: Amerikansk fodbold-tøj
de: American Football-Uniformen
es: Uniformes de fútbol americano
fr: Tenues de football américain
it: Divise da football americano
ja: アメフトユニフォーム
nl: American football tenues
no: Drakter til amerikansk fotball
pl: Stroje do futbolu amerykańskiego
pt: Uniformes de futebol americano
ru: Форма для американского футбола
sv: Amerikansk fotboll-dräkter
tr: Amerikan Futbolu Formaları

en: Baseball Uniforms
xx: Baseball Uniforms
cs: Baseballové dresy
da: Baseballtøj
de: Baseballuniformen
es: Uniformes de béisbol
fr: Tenues de baseball
it: Divise da baseball
ja: 野球ユニフォーム
nl: Honkbaltenues
no: Baseballdrakter
pl: Stroje do baseballu
pt: Uniformes de beisebol
ru: Бейсбольная форма
sv: Baseballdräkter
tr: Beyzbol Formaları

en: Basketball Uniforms
xx: Basketball Uniforms
cs: Basketbalové dresy
da: Basketballtøj
de: Basketballuniformen
es: Uniformes de baloncesto
fr: Tenues de basket-ball
it: Divise da basket
ja: バスケットボールユニフォーム
nl: Basketbaltenues
no: Basketballdrakter
pl: Stroje do koszykówki
pt: Uniformes de basquete
ru: Баскетбольная форма
sv: Basketdräkter
tr: Basketbol Formaları

en: Cheerleading Uniforms
xx: Cheerleading Uniforms
cs: Dresy pro roztleskávačky
da: Cheerleadertøj
de: Cheerleading-Uniformen
es: Uniformes de animadoras
fr: Tenues de cheerleading
it: Divise da cheerleader
ja: チアリーディングユニフォーム
nl: Cheerleaderoutfits
no: Cheerleader-uniformer
pl: Stroje cheerleaderek
pt: Uniformes de líderes de torcida
ru: Форма для чирлидинга
sv: Cheerleadingdräkter
tr: Ponpon Kız Formaları

en: Cricket Uniforms
xx: Cricket Uniforms
cs: Kriketové dresy
da: Crickettøj
de: Kricketuniformen
es: Uniformes de cricket
fr: Tenues de cricket
it: Divise da cricket
ja: クリケットユニフォーム
nl: Crickettenues
no: Cricketdrakter
pl: Stroje do krykieta
pt: Uniformes de críquete
ru: Форма для крикета
sv: Cricketdräkter
tr: Kriket Formaları

en: Hockey Uniforms
xx: Hockey Uniforms
cs: Hokejové dresy
da: Ishockeytøj
de: Hockeyuniformen
es: Uniformes de hockey
fr: Tenues de hockey
it: Divise da hockey
ja: ホッケーユニフォーム
nl: IJshockeytenues
no: Hockeydrakter
pl: Stroje do hokeja
pt: Uniformes de hóquei
ru: Хоккейная форма
sv: Hockeydräkter
tr: Hokey Formaları

en: Martial Arts Uniforms
xx: Martial Arts Uniforms
cs: Oblečení pro bojová umění
da: Kampsportstøj
de: Kampfsportuniformen
es: Uniformes de artes marciales
fr: Tenues d'arts martiaux
it: Uniformi per arti marziali
ja: 胴着
nl: Martial arts-kleding
no: Kampsportdrakter
pl: Stroje do sztuk walki
pt: Uniformes para artes marciais
ru: Одежда для боевых искусств
sv: Kampsportsdräkter
tr: Dövüş Üniformaları

en: Officiating Uniforms
xx: Officiating Uniforms
cs: Slavnostní uniformy
da: Dommertøj
de: Schiedsrichteruniformen
es: Uniformes de arbitraje
fr: Tenues d'arbitre
it: Uniformi da arbitro
ja: 審判用ユニフォーム
nl: Scheidsrechterstenues
no: Dommerdrakter
pl: Stroje sędziego
pt: Uniformes oficiais
ru: Судейская форма
sv: Domardräkter
tr: Hakem Üniformaları

en: Soccer Uniforms
xx: Soccer Uniforms
cs: Fotbalové dresy
da: Fodboldtøj
de: Fußballuniformen
es: Equipaciones de fútbol
fr: Tenues de football
it: Divise da calcio
ja: サッカーユニフォーム
nl: Voetbaltenues
no: Fotballdrakter
pl: Stroje do piłki nożnej
pt: Uniformes de futebol
ru: Футбольная форма
sv: Fotbollsdräkter
tr: Futbol Formaları

en: Softball Uniforms
xx: Softball Uniforms
cs: Softbalové dresy
da: Softballtøj
de: Softballuniformen
es: Uniformes de sóftbol
fr: Tenues de softball
it: Divise da softball
ja: ソフトボールユニフォーム
nl: Softbaltenues
no: Softballdrakter
pl: Stroje do softballu
pt: Uniformes de softbol
ru: Форма для софтбола
sv: Softballdräkter
tr: Softbol Formaları

en: Wrestling Uniforms
xx: Wrestling Uniforms
cs: Zápasnické dresy
da: Wrestlingtøj
de: Ringeruniformen
es: Uniformes de lucha libre
fr: Tenues de lutte
it: Uniformi da lotta
ja: レスリングユニフォーム
nl: Worstelkleding
no: Brytedrakter
pl: Stroje do wrestlingu
pt: Uniformes de luta
ru: Одежда для борьбы
sv: Brottningsdräkter
tr: Güreş Mayoları

en: White Coats
xx: White Coats
cs: Bílé pláště
da: Kitler
de: Ärztekittel
es: Batas blancas
fr: Blouses blanches
it: Camici bianchi
ja: 白衣
nl: Witte jassen
no: Hvite frakker
pl: Fartuchy laboratoryjne
pt: Jalecos
ru: Белые халаты
sv: Labbrockar
tr: Laboratuvar Önlükleri

en: Wedding & Bridal Party Dresses
xx: Wedding & Bridal Party Dresses
cs: Svatební oděvy
da: Tøj til bryllup og bryllupsfester
de: Brautmoden
es: Vestidos de novia y para el cortejo nupcial
fr: Vêtements de mariage
it: Vestiti da sposa
ja: ブライダルウェア
nl: Bruidskleding
no: Brude- og bryllupskjoler
pl: Suknie ślubne i sukienki na wesele
pt: Roupas para casamento
ru: Свадебные наряды
sv: Brudklänningar och klänningar till brudföljet
tr: Düğün ve Evlilik Töreni Elbiseleri

en: Bridal Party Dresses
xx: Bridal Party Dresses
cs: Šaty na svatební hostinu
da: Kjoler til bryllupsfester
de: Brautjungfernkleider
es: Vestidos para el cortejo nupcial
fr: Robes de mariage
it: Abiti per feste di matrimonio
ja: 結婚式用パーティードレス
nl: Jurken voor bruidsmeisjes
no: Bryllupskjoler
pl: Sukienki na wesele
pt: Vestidos para festas de casamento
ru: Платья для подружек невесты
sv: Klänningar till brudföljet
tr: Evlilik Töreni Elbiseleri

en: Wedding Dresses
xx: Wedding Dresses
cs: Šaty pro nevěsty
da: Brudekjoler
de: Brautkleider
es: Vestidos de novia
fr: Robes de mariée
it: Abiti da sposa
ja: ウエディングドレス
nl: Bruidsjurken
no: Brudekjoler
pl: Suknie ślubne
pt: Vestidos de noiva
ru: Свадебные платья
sv: Brudklänningar
tr: Gelinlikler

en: Clothing Accessories
xx: Clothing Accessories
cs: Oděvní doplňky
da: Tilbehør til tøj
de: Bekleidungsaccessoires
es: Complementos
fr: Accessoires d'habillement
it: Accessori di abbigliamento
ja: ファッション小物
nl: Kledingaccessoires
no: Klestilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do ubrań
pt: Acessórios para roupas
ru: Принадлежности для одежды
sv: Klädesaccessoarer
tr: Kıyafet Aksesuarları

en: Arm Warmers & Sleeves
xx: Arm Warmers & Sleeves
cs: Návleky na ruce
da: Armvarmere
de: Armstulpen
es: Calientabrazos
fr: Couvre-bras et manches
it: Scaldabraccia
ja: アームウォーマー
nl: Armwarmers
no: Armvarmere
pl: Ocieplacze na ramiona
pt: Aquecedores de braço e mangotes
ru: Теплые изделия для рук
sv: Armvärmare
tr: Kol Tozlukları